Massachusetts, session 194th, H4816.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 87 of chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the words "utility steam distribution system,", in line 9, the
following words:- nor shall such provisions apply to such pipefitting performed by a person in
the employ of a contractor or subcontractor retained by any one of said organizations for any
work required on the organization's premises or property,
of 1